Washington statutes.
RCW 19.68.005

Definition.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

"Electronic health record technology" means items and services, in the form of software or information technology and training services, necessary and used predominantly to create, maintain, transmit, or receive electronic health records.

[ 2013 c 297 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Retroactive application—2013 c 297: See notes following RCW 19.68.900.